Massachusetts, session 194th, H506.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 2JJJJJJ,
added by section 7 of chapter 248 of chapter 2024, the following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set upon the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the PLAY Trust Fund. The commissioner of the
department of elementary and secondary education shall administer the fund. The fund shall be
used for: (i) funding youth athletics for K-8 public school students in districts across the
commonwealth; (ii) supporting K-8 public school students and their families by paying fees
related to sports that they are unable to afford to pay; and (iii) combating childhood obesity by
promoting and allowing children to play youth sports.
(b) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations and other money
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds
from public and private sources such as gifts, grants and donations; (iii) 1 per cent of the total
of 2

funds collected from the excised tax imposed upon sports wagering operators in the
commonwealth pursuant to section 14 of chapter 23N; and (iv) interest earned on money in the
fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money
remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
(c) Annually, not later than October 1, the commissioner of elementary and secondary
education shall report to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee
on education and the house and senate committees on ways and means on the fund’s activities.
The report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the source and amount of funds received; (ii)
the expenditures made from the fund and the purposes of such expenditures; (iii) any anticipated
remaining revenue from awards; (vi) the number of students and families who received funding;
and (v) the report shall be publicly available on the department’s website.
of 2